fr: Système de dosettes de café compatible: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Autre
da: Kompatibelt kaffekapselsystem: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilni sustav s kapsulama za kavu: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Ostalo
vi: Hệ thống viên nén cà phê tương thích: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Khác
de: Kompatibles Kaffeekapselsystem: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Sonstige
el: Συμβατό σύστημα καψουλών καφέ: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Άλλο
pl: Zgodny system saszetek z kawą: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Inne
nb: Kompatibelt kaffepodsystem: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Annet
zh-CN: 适配的咖啡胶囊系统: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; 其他
nl: Compatibel koffiecapsulesysteem: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Overig
ro-RO: Sistem de capsule de cafea compatibil: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Altele
ja: 対応コーヒーポッドシステム: ドルチェグスト; E.S.E.; キューリグ K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; その他
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem za kavne blazinice: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Drugo
fi: Yhteensopiva kahvikapselijärjestelmä: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместима система за кафе капсули: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Друго
tr: Uyumlu kahve kapsülü sistemi: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Diğer
ru: Совместимая система кофейных капсул: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Другое
lt-LT: Suderinama kavos kapsulių sistema: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Kita
pt-BR: Sistema de cápsulas de café compatível: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis kávékapszula-rendszer: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní systém kávových kapslí: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Jiné
ko: 호환 캡슐 커피 시스템: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; 기타
it: Sistema di capsule da caffè compatibile: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Altro
th: ระบบแคปซูลกาแฟที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; อื่นๆ
es: Sistema de monodosis de café compatible: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Otro
zh-TW: 相容咖啡膠囊系統: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; 其他
sk-SK: Systém kompatibilných kávových kapsúl: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Iné
sv: Kompatibelt kaffekapselsystem: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Annat
pt-PT: Sistema compatível com cápsulas de café: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Outro
en: Compatible coffee pod system: Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Lavazza Blue; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo; Other